District of Columbia statutes.
42-3501.01

Findings.

The Council of the District of Columbia finds that:

(1)

There is a severe shortage of rental housing available to citizens of the District of Columbia (“District”).

(2)

The shortage of housing is growing due to the withdrawal of housing units from the housing market, deterioration of existing housing units, and the lack of development of new or rehabilitation of vacant housing units.

(3)

The shortage of housing is felt most acutely among low- and moderate-income renters, who are finding a shrinking pool of available dwellings.

(4)

The cost of basic accommodation is so high as to cause undue hardship for many citizens of the District of Columbia.

(5)

Many low- and moderate-income tenants need assistance to cover basic shelter costs, but the assistance should maximize individual choice.

(6)

The Rent Stabilization Program (“Program”) has a more substantial impact upon small housing providers than on large housing providers, and small housing providers find it more difficult to use the administrative machinery of the Program.

(7)

Many small housing providers are experiencing financial difficulties and are in need of some special mechanisms to assist them and their tenants.

(8)

The present Rent Stabilization Program should not be continued indefinitely and new approaches must be investigated to prevent the withdrawal of rental housing units from the market and the deterioration of existing rental housing units, and to increase the rental housing supply.

(9)

The housing crisis in the District has not substantially improved since the passage of the Rental Housing Act of 1980.

(10)

The Rent Stabilization Program should be extended for 6 years.

(11)

This extension of the Rent Stabilization Program is required to preserve the public peace, health, safety, and general welfare.

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 101, 32 DCR 3089
Real property tax assignment, applicable tenant protection provisions, see § 47-1303.04.
Rental housing conversion and sale, see § 42-3401.01 et seq.
This section is referenced in § 42-3401.03 and § 47-1303.04.
1981 Ed., § 45-2501.
Section 907 of D.C. Law 6-10, as amended by § 2(d) of D.C. Law 8-48, § 818 of D.C. Law 11-52, § 1202(b) of D.C. Law 13-172, and § 2 of D.C. Law 16-10, codified as § 42-3509.07, provided that all subchapters of this chapter, except III and V, shall terminate on December 31, 2010.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 6-10, see Mayor’s Order 85-167, October 2, 1985.
See Mayor’s Order 86-27, February 6, 1986, as amended by Mayor’s Order 86-166, September 19, 1986.